Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 27-38.
Repealed by Acts 1950, p. 316.

Cross references.

For present statute on the same subject as the repealed section, see §

15.2-1511

.

§ 27-39.
Counties, cities and towns authorized to provide relief.

Any county, city or town which operates fire-fighting equipment may provide for the relief of (1) any children and surviving spouse of any fire fighter who dies (2) and on or before July 1, 1977, shall provide for the relief of any fire fighter who is disabled by injury or illness as the direct or proximate result of the performance of his duty, including the presumption under §

27-40.1

, in the service of the county, city or town or any political subdivision with which it contracts or has contracted for fire protection, whether such fire fighter be a member of a fire company of the county in which the injury occurred or of a political subdivision with which it contracts for fire protection. Such total disability retirement benefits shall be not less than those provided under the in-line-of-duty disability retirement provisions of §

51.1-157

. Such relief of any children and surviving spouse of any fire fighter who dies shall be exclusive of, and not dependent upon, any payment under the Line of Duty Act (§

9.1-400

et seq.).

History.

1946, p. 609; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 2743m; 1948, p. 161; 1970, c. 187; 1973, c. 543; 1976, c. 772; 1977, c. 326.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1970, c. 187, cl. 3, provides that this section shall be liberally construed and is severable.

§ 27-40.
Support of dependent children of firemen.

The governing bodies of cities of the first class may, by ordinance adopted by a recorded vote of a majority of the members elected to each branch, if there be more than one branch, appropriate money out of the public funds to aid in the support of dependent children of members of the fire departments of such cities who may have lost their lives through injuries received or illness incurred while in the performance of their duties as members of such fire departments; such aid to continue in the case of each such child until he or she shall have attained the age of sixteen years, and the payment of same to be made monthly to the lawful guardian of such dependent children and in such amounts as the governing body of such city may deem wise and just.

History.

1918, p. 224; Michie Code 1942, § 3035a.

§ 27-40.1.
Presumption as to death or disability from respiratory diseases, hypertension or heart disease.

The death of, or any condition or impairment of health of salaried or volunteer fire fighters caused by respiratory diseases, hypertension or heart disease resulting in total or partial disability shall be presumed to have been suffered in the line of duty unless the contrary be shown by a preponderance of competent evidence; provided that prior to making any claim based upon such presumption for retirement, sickness or other benefits on account of such death or total or partial disability, such salaried or volunteer fire fighters shall have been found free from respiratory diseases, hypertension or heart disease, as the case may be, by a physical examination which shall include such appropriate laboratory and other diagnostic studies as such governing body shall prescribe and which shall have been conducted by physicians whose qualifications shall have been prescribed by such governing body; and provided, further, that any such fire fighter or, in the case of his death, any person entitled to make a claim for such benefits, claiming that his death or disability was suffered in the line of duty shall, if requested by such governing body or its authorized representative, submit himself, in the case of claim for disability benefits, to physical examination by any physician designated by such governing body, which examination may include such tests or studies as may reasonably be prescribed by the physician so designated or, in the case of a claim for death benefits, submit the body of the deceased fire fighter to a postmortem examination to be performed by the medical examiner for the county, city or town appointed under §

32.1-282

. Such fire fighter or claimant shall have the right to have present at such examination, at his own expense, any qualified physician he may designate.

History.

1964, c. 216; 1972, c. 607; 1973, c. 543; 1976, c. 772; 1977, c. 326; 1978, c. 768.

The numbers of this section and §

27-40.2

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1964 act having assigned no numbers.

Cross references.

As to the purchase of continued health insurance coverage by the surviving spouse and any dependents of an active or retired local law-enforcement officer, firefighter, etc., through the Department of Human Resource Management, see §

2.2-1205

.

As to the use of tobacco products by state employees, see §

2.2-2902

.

As to the Line of Duty Act, see §

9.1-400

et seq.

As to payments to beneficiaries of certain deceased law-enforcement officers, firefighters and retirees, see §

9.1-402

.

As to use of tobacco products by government employees, see §

15.2-1504

.

§ 27-40.1:1.
Performance of physical examinations required by § 27-40.1.

Any county, city or town providing death, retirement, sickness or other benefits pursuant to the authority granted by §

27-39

, or pursuant to any other provision of law or the charter of any city or town, or otherwise, shall do so exclusive of, and without regard to, any such benefits paid or payable out of the general fund of the state treasury pursuant to §

9.1-400

et seq. and shall by ordinance make provision for the employment of physicians and the performance of the physical examination required by §

27-40.1

and shall cause such examination to be made within ninety days after June 1, 1973, of every fire fighter in its service or the service of a political subdivision with which it has contracted for fire protection and of every fire fighter entering upon such service thereafter at the time of such entry, provided however, that any fire fighter employed by any such county, city or town which failed to cause such physical examination to be made on or before January 1, 1976, for any fire fighter employed prior to January 1, 1976, in its service or the service of a political subdivision with which it has contracted for fire protection shall be presumed to have been found free from respiratory disease, hypertension or heart disease as if such fire fighter had been examined pursuant to §

27-40.1

. Such presumption shall also apply to the benefit of any fire fighter entering upon such service on or after January 1, 1976, unless said county, city or town shall cause such examination to be made of such fire fighter within ninety days after July 1, 1976. Every fire fighter entering upon such service on or after October 1, 1976, and thereafter, shall be entitled to the benefit of such presumption unless such county, city or town shall cause such examination to be made of such fire fighter at the time of such entry.

History.

1973, c. 543; 1976, c. 772; 1977, c. 326.

§ 27-40.2.
Employing such presumption in determining eligibility for benefits.

Such presumption, subject to the provisions of §

27-40

.1, shall be employed in determining eligibility for death, retirement, sickness and other benefits provided pursuant to the authority granted by §§

27-39

,

27-40

, or pursuant to any other provision of law or the charter of any city or town, or otherwise for persons who die or become totally or partially disabled; provided, however, that such presumption shall be used to determine eligibility for death benefits for all fire fighters employed by the City of Portsmouth when death occurs subsequent to July 1, 1972.

History.

1964, c. 216; 1972, c. 607; 1973, c. 543; 1974, c. 579; 1977, c. 326.

Cross references.

As to the purchase of continued health insurance coverage by the surviving spouse and any dependents of an active or retired local law-enforcement officer, firefighter, etc., through the Department of Human Resource Management, see §

2.2-1205

.

As to the Line of Duty Act, see §

9.1-400

.

As to continued health insurance coverage for disabled persons, their spouses and dependents, and for the surviving spouse and dependents of certain deceased law-enforcement officers, firefighters, see §

9.1-401

.

As to payments to beneficiaries of certain deceased law-enforcement officers, firefighters and retirees, see §

9.1-402

.

§ 27-40.3.
Definition.

For the purposes of this article the term “volunteer fire fighters” shall be defined as in §

27-42

.

History.

1972, c. 607; 1977, c. 326.

§ 27-40.4.
Income earned during disability retirement; reduction in benefits.

If any person is entitled to and receives pensions and benefits under this article and subsequently becomes employed, whether full-time or part-time, the pensions and benefits received shall be reduced by the amount of income received which exceeds the difference between the benefits received under this article and the amount of pay to which he would have been entitled had his employment progressed in the same rank and grade with credit for the level of seniority he would have attained had he not been disabled. Such a reduction in benefits shall continue until the time he becomes eligible for normal retirement, had he remained uninjured and continued his employment. For the purposes of this section, “income” means gross income received less deductions for social security taxes only.

Any person receiving pensions or benefits under the provisions of this article shall upon request, on or before May 1 of each year, provide a true and correct copy of all W-2 forms showing income received, or a statement under oath as to whether he has received compensation for work performed in the previous calendar year, to the governing body of the jurisdiction which is the source of the pension, or to that body’s designee. Refusal to provide such documents shall be grounds for termination of benefits under this section, until such documents are produced. Production of the documents shall be required only until such time as the person shall be eligible for normal retirement, had he remained uninjured and continued his employment.

Nothing contained herein shall limit or restrict the right of any person to receive workers’ compensation benefits under Title 65.2, as amended.

History.

1983, c. 351.